Alaska statutes. Title 35. Public Buildings, Works, and Improvements.
Article 5. Utilities and Encroachments in Public Facilities.

Sec. 35.10.210.
Use of public facilities for utilities.

A utility facility may be constructed, placed, or maintained across, along, over, under, or within a state public facility only in accordance with regulations adopted or procedures prescribed by the department and only if authorized by a written permit issued by the department.
The department may charge a fee for a permit issued under this section.

History.

(§ 7 ch 142 SLA 1986; am § 49 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For utility permits, see 17 AAC 15, art. 1.

For utility standards and requirements, see 17 AAC 15, art. 2.

For utility relocation and installation, see 17 AAC 15, art. 3.

Sec. 35.10.220.
Relocation of utility facilities incident to public facility projects.

If, incident to the construction of a public facility project, the department determines and orders that a utility facility located across, along, over, under, or within a state public facility must be changed, relocated, or removed, the utility owning or maintaining the facility shall change, relocate, or remove it in accordance with the order, within a reasonable time set by the department in the order.

If the utility facility is not changed, relocated, or removed in accordance with the order, a permit authorizing the utility issued by the department under AS

35.10.210

becomes invalid and the facility will be considered an unauthorized encroachment subject to the provisions of AS

35.10.270

.

The cost of change, relocation, or removal, as defined in AS

35.95.100

, ordered under (a) of this section is to be paid as follows:

by the department as a cost of public facility construction, if the utility facility is installed or authorized after June 11, 1986 under a utility permit or a regulation and is installed in the location specified in the permit;

by the department as a cost of public facility construction, if the facility was installed before June 11, 1986 under a utility permit and is in the location specified in the permit;

by the department as a cost of public facility construction, if the utility facility was installed before the location became a state public facility or before permits were required;

by the department as a cost of public facility construction, if the utility permit that requires the utility to pay the relocation cost was issued more than five years before the contract for the public facility construction project was first advertised;

by the utility in all other cases unless the commissioner finds it is in the public interest for the cost to be paid by the department.

History.

(§ 7 ch 142 SLA 1986)

Administrative Code. —

For utility relocation and installation, see 17 AAC 15, art. 3.

For railroads, see 17 AAC 15, art. 4.

Sec. 35.10.230.
Encroachment permits.

An encroachment may be constructed, placed, changed, or maintained across or within a public facility, but only in accordance with regulations or procedures adopted by the department.
An encroachment may not be constructed, placed, maintained, or changed until it is authorized by a written permit issued by the department, unless the department provides otherwise by regulation.
The department may charge a fee for a permit issued under this section.

History.

(§ 7 ch 142 SLA 1986; am § 50 ch 36 SLA 1990)

Administrative Code. —

For utility permits, see 17 AAC 15, art. 1.

For utility standards and requirements, see 17 AAC 15, art. 2.

For utility relocation and installation, see 17 AAC 15, art. 3.

Sec. 35.10.240.
Relocation or removal of encroachment.

If, incidental to the construction or maintenance of a state public facility, the department determines and orders that an encroachment previously authorized by written permit must be changed, relocated, or removed, the owner of the encroachment shall change, relocate, or remove it within a reasonable time set by the department in the order.
The cost of the change, relocation, or removal shall be paid as provided in AS

35.10.220(c)

.
If the owner does not change, relocate, or remove an encroachment within the time set by the department, the encroachment is considered an unauthorized encroachment and subject to the provisions of AS

35.10.270

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 142 SLA 1986)

Sec. 35.10.250.
Unauthorized encroachments.

If an unauthorized encroachment exists in, on, under, or over a state public facility, the department may require the removal of the encroachment, at the expense of the owner, in the manner provided in AS

35.10.260

—

35.10.270

.

History.

(§ 7 ch 142 SLA 1986)

Sec. 35.10.260.
Notice of removal of unauthorized encroachment.

Notice shall be given the owner, occupant, or person in possession of an unauthorized encroachment, or to another person causing or permitting the encroachment to exist, by serving upon any of them a notice demanding the removal of the encroachment within a time limit set by the department.
The notice must describe the encroachment with reasonable certainty as to its character and location. Service of the notice may be made by certified mail.

History.

(§ 7 ch 142 SLA 1986)

Sec. 35.10.270.
Removal after noncompliance; removal expense.

After a failure of the owner of an unauthorized encroachment to comply with the notice or order of the department under AS

35.10.220

,

35.10.240

, or

35.10.260

, the department may remove the encroachment, or cause it to be removed.
The owner of the unauthorized encroachment shall pay to the department

the expense of the removal of the encroachment;

all costs and expenses paid by the state as a result of a claim or claims filed against the state by third parties for damages due to delays because the encroachment was not changed, removed, or relocated according to the order of the department; and

costs and expense of suit.

History.

(§ 7 ch 142 SLA 1986)